Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4301
(UDTA 1) Act, how cited.

(UDTA 1) Sections 30-4301 to 30-4319 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Uniform Directed Trust Act.

Laws 2019, LB536, § 1.